Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-561
Act; applicability.

The Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act shall not apply with respect to any motor vehicle owned by the United States, the State of Nebraska, any political subdivision of this state, or any municipality therein. Except for section 60-551, such act shall not apply with respect to any motor vehicle which is subject to the requirements of section 75-307, nor shall sections 60-516 to 60-544 apply to any automobile liability policy which has not been certified as provided in sections 60-528 to 60-531 as proof of financial responsibility.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 61, p. 503;

Laws 1965, c. 389, § 3, p. 1246;

Laws 1987, LB 149, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 46.

Amendment in 1965 to this section limited application of Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act to policies certified as proof of financial responsibility. State Farm Mut. Ins. Co. v. Pierce, 182 Neb. 805, 157 N.W.2d 399 (1968).

Amendment of this section in 1965 operated prospectively only. Universal Underwriters Ins. Co. v. Wagner, 367 F.2d 866 (8th Cir. 1966).